District of Columbia statutes.
37-201.06

Record of inspections.

The Director shall keep in his office a record of weighing and measuring devices inspected, which record shall show the type of device, the name and address of the owner, the date of inspection, and whether the same was approved or condemned. Such record shall be open to the public during regular office hours.

History

Mar. 3, 1921, 41 Stat. 1219, ch. 118, § 6
Apr. 11, 1946, 60 Stat. 88, ch. 134, § 1

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 10-107.
1973 Ed., § 10-106.

Editor's Notes

Department of Weights, Measures and Markets abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 37-201.01.